Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5931.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-11-25 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-11 entitled "Suspension
or Revocation of Licenses — Violations" is hereby repealed.
31-11-25. Suspension for failure to pay fine.
(a) The division of motor vehicles shall suspend the license of a person to operate a motor
vehicle upon certification of the clerk of any county of the superior court or any supervising deputy
clerk of the district court or a clerk of the traffic tribunal that the person has failed to pay fines or
costs imposed for a violation of any provision of this title within the time period provided for
payment by the court, or has failed to make satisfactory arrangements with the court for payment
of the fines or costs; provided, however, the person shall first be entitled to request an ability to pay
hearing by filing a request with the court that imposed the fines or costs.
(b) The suspension shall remain in force until all fines or costs are paid to the respective
court or satisfactory arrangements have been made with the court for payment of the fines or costs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001932
========